src/pronouns.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
    +Pron
    +Nom +Voc +Acc +Gen +Dat +Abl ! Cases
    +Sg +Pl ! Numbers
    +Masc +Fem +Neut +MFN +MN ! Genders

LEXICON Root
hic+Pron: Hic ;

ille+Pron:ill     IlleIste ;
iste+Pron:ist     IlleIste ;
ipse+Pron:ips     Ipse ;
ipse+Pron+3rd:ips Ipse ;

is+Pron:     Is ;
is+Pron+3rd: Is ;

qui+Pron:  Qui ;
quis+Pron: Qui ;
quis+Pron+Masc+Nom+Sg:quis # ;
quis+Pron+Neut+Nom+Sg:quid # ;
quis+Pron+Neut+Acc+Sg:quid # ;

     Personals ;

LEXICON Hic
+Masc+Nom+Sg:hic  # ;
+Masc+Acc+Sg:hunc # ;

+Fem+Nom+Sg:haec  # ;
+Fem+Acc+Sg:haec # ;
+Fem+Abl+Sg:hac  # ;

+Neut+Nom+Sg:hoc # ;
+Neut+Acc+Sg:hoc # ;

+MFN+Gen+Sg:huius # ;
+MFN+Dat+Sg:hui   # ;
+MN+Abl+Sg:hoc    # ;

+Masc+Nom+Pl:hi  # ;
+Masc+Acc+Pl:hos # ;

+Fem+Nom+Pl:hae   # ;
+Fem+Acc+Pl:has   # ;
+Fem+Gen+Pl:harum # ;

+Neut+Nom+Pl:haec # ;
+Neut+Acc+Pl:haec # ;

+MN+Gen+Pl:horum # ;
+MFN+Dat+Pl:his  # ;
+MFN+Abl+Pl:his  # ;

LEXICON IlleIste
+Neut+Nom+Sg:ud # ;
+Neut+Acc+Sg:ud # ;
    IlleIsteIpse ;

LEXICON Ipse
+Neut+Nom+Sg:um # ;
+Neut+Acc+Sg:um # ;
    IlleIsteIpse ;

LEXICON IlleIsteIpse
+Masc+Nom+Sg:e  # ;
+Masc+Acc+Sg:um # ;

+Fem+Nom+Sg:a  # ;
+Fem+Acc+Sg:am # ;
+Fem+Abl+Sg:a  # ;

+MFN+Gen+Sg:ius # ;
+MFN+Dat+Sg:i   # ;
+MN+Abl+Sg:o    # ;

+Masc+Nom+Pl:i    # ;
+Masc+Nom+Pl:i    # ;
+Masc+Acc+Pl:os   # ;

+Fem+Nom+Pl:ae   # ;
+Fem+Acc+Pl:as   # ;
+Fem+Gen+Pl:arum # ;

+Neut+Nom+Pl:a # ;
+Neut+Acc+Pl:a # ;

+MN+Gen+Pl:orum # ;
+MFN+Dat+Pl:is  # ;
+MFN+Abl+Pl:is  # ;

! TODO: idem.
LEXICON Is
+Masc+Nom+Sg:is  # ;
+Masc+Acc+Sg:eum # ;

+Fem+Nom+Sg:ea  # ;
+Fem+Acc+Sg:eam # ;
+Fem+Abl+Sg:ea  # ;

+Neut+Nom+Sg:id # ;
+Neut+Acc+Sg:id # ;

+MFN+Gen+Sg:eius # ;
+MFN+Dat+Sg:ei   # ;
+MN+Abl+Sg:eo    # ;

+Masc+Nom+Pl:ei  # ;
+Masc+Nom+Pl:ii  # ;
+Masc+Acc+Pl:eos # ;

+Fem+Nom+Pl:eae   # ;
+Fem+Acc+Pl:eas   # ;
+Fem+Gen+Pl:earum # ;

+Neut+Nom+Pl:ea # ;
+Neut+Acc+Pl:ea # ;

+MN+Gen+Pl:eorum # ;
+MFN+Dat+Pl:eis  # ;
+MFN+Dat+Pl:iis  # ;
+MFN+Abl+Pl:eis  # ;
+MFN+Abl+Pl:iis  # ;

! TODO: quisquis, and friends.
LEXICON Qui
+Masc+Nom+Sg:qui  # ;
+Masc+Acc+Sg:quem # ;

+Fem+Nom+Sg:quae # ;
+Fem+Acc+Sg:quam # ;
+Fem+Abl+Sg:qua  # ;

+Neut+Nom+Sg:quod # ;
+Neut+Acc+Sg:quod # ;

+MFN+Gen+Sg:cuius # ;
+MFN+Dat+Sg:cui   # ;
+MN+Abl+Sg:quo    # ;

+Masc+Nom+Pl:qui  # ;
+Masc+Acc+Pl:quos # ;

+Fem+Nom+Pl:quae   # ;
+Fem+Acc+Pl:quas   # ;
+Fem+Gen+Pl:quarum # ;

+Neut+Nom+Pl:quae # ;
+Neut+Acc+Pl:quae # ;

+MN+Gen+Pl:quorum  # ;
+MFN+Dat+Pl:quibus # ;
+MFN+Abl+Pl:quibus # ;

LEXICON Personals
ego+Pron+1st+MFN+Nom+Sg:ego  # ;
ego+Pron+1st+MFN+Acc+Sg:me   # ;
ego+Pron+1st+MFN+Gen+Sg:mei  # ;
ego+Pron+1st+MFN+Dat+Sg:mihi # ;
ego+Pron+1st+MFN+Abl+Sg:me   # ;

nos+Pron+1st+MFN+Nom+Pl:nos     # ;
nos+Pron+1st+MFN+Acc+Pl:nos     # ;
nos+Pron+1st+MFN+Gen+Pl:nostri  # ;
nos+Pron+1st+MFN+Gen+Pl:nostrum # ;
nos+Pron+1st+MFN+Dat+Pl:nobis   # ;
nos+Pron+1st+MFN+Abl+Pl:nobis   # ;

tu+Pron+2nd+MFN+Nom+Sg:tu   # ;
tu+Pron+2nd+MFN+Voc+Sg:tu   # ;
tu+Pron+2nd+MFN+Acc+Sg:te   # ;
tu+Pron+2nd+MFN+Gen+Sg:tui  # ;
tu+Pron+2nd+MFN+Dat+Sg:tibi # ;
tu+Pron+2nd+MFN+Abl+Sg:te   # ;

vos+Pron+2nd+MFN+Nom+Pl:vos     # ;
vos+Pron+2nd+MFN+Acc+Pl:vos     # ;
vos+Pron+2nd+MFN+Gen+Pl:vestri  # ;
vos+Pron+2nd+MFN+Gen+Pl:vestrum # ;
vos+Pron+2nd+MFN+Dat+Pl:vobis   # ;
vos+Pron+2nd+MFN+Abl+Pl:vobis   # ;

se+Pron+3rd+MFN+Acc+Sg:se # ;
se+Pron+3rd+MFN+Gen+Sg:sui # ;
se+Pron+3rd+MFN+Dat+Sg:sibi # ;
se+Pron+3rd+MFN+Abl+Sg:se # ;

se+Pron+3rd+MFN+Acc+Pl:se # ;
se+Pron+3rd+MFN+Gen+Pl:sui # ;
se+Pron+3rd+MFN+Dat+Pl:sibi # ;
se+Pron+3rd+MFN+Abl+Pl:se # ;
